Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 50-73.1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Certificate of limited partnership”
means the certificate referred to in §

50-73.11

, and the certificate as amended or restated.

“Commission”
means the State Corporation Commission.

“Contribution”
means any cash, property, services rendered, or a promissory note or other binding obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services, which a partner contributes to a limited partnership in his capacity as a partner.

“Domestic,”
with respect to an entity, means an entity governed as to its internal affairs by the organic law of the Commonwealth.

“Domestic business trust”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1201

.

“Domestic corporation”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-603

.

“Domestic limited liability company”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1002

.

“Domestic nonstock corporation”
has the same meaning as “domestic corporation” as specified in §

13.1-803

.

“Domestic partnership”
means an association of two or more persons to carry on as co-owners a business for profit formed under §

50-73.88

, or predecessor law of the Commonwealth, and includes, for all purposes of the laws of the Commonwealth, a registered limited liability partnership.

“Effective date,”
when referring to a document for which effectiveness is contingent upon the filing with or issuance of a certificate by the Commission, means the time and date determined in accordance with subsection C of §

50-73.17

.

“Entity”
includes any domestic or foreign limited partnership or other business entity, any estate or trust, and any state, the United States, and any foreign government.

“Event of withdrawal of a general partner”
means an event that causes a person to cease to be a general partner as provided in §

50-73.28

.

“Foreign,”
with respect to an entity, means an entity governed as to its internal affairs by the organic law of a jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth.

“Foreign business trust”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1201

.

“Foreign corporation”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-603

.

“Foreign limited liability company”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1002

.

“Foreign limited partnership”
means a partnership formed under the laws of any state or jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth and having as partners one or more general partners and one or more limited partners.

“Foreign partnership”
means an association of two or more persons to carry on as co-owners of a business for profit formed under the laws of any state or jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth, and includes, for all purposes of the laws of the Commonwealth, a foreign registered limited liability partnership.

“Foreign registered limited liability partnership”
has the same meaning as specified in §

50-73.79

.

“General partner”
means a person who has been admitted to a limited partnership as a general partner in accordance with the partnership agreement and named in the certificate of limited partnership as a general partner.

“Jurisdiction of formation”
means the state or country the law of which includes the organic law governing a domestic or foreign limited partnership or other business entity.

“Limited partner”
means a person who has been admitted to a limited partnership as a limited partner in accordance with the partnership agreement.

“Limited partnership”
and

“domestic limited partnership”

mean a partnership formed by two or more persons under the laws of the Commonwealth and having one or more general partners and one or more limited partners.

“Liquidating trustee”
means a person, other than a general partner, but including a limited partner, who carries out the winding up of a limited partnership as provided in this chapter.

“Organic law”
means the statute governing the internal affairs of a domestic or foreign limited partnership or eligible entity.

“Other business entity”
means a domestic or foreign stock corporation, nonstock corporation, business trust, limited liability company, or partnership.

“Partner”
means a limited or general partner.

“Partnership agreement”
means any valid agreement, written or oral, of the partners as to the affairs of a limited partnership and the conduct of its business.

“Partnership interest”
means a partner’s share of the profits and losses of a limited partnership and the right to receive distributions of partnership assets.

“Person”
means an individual, partnership, limited partnership (domestic or foreign), trust, estate, association, corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Principal office”
means the office, in or out of the Commonwealth, where the principal executive offices of a domestic or foreign limited partnership are located. Any reference to a specified office contained in the records of the Commission as of July 1, 2010, shall be deemed, in all instances, to be a reference to the principal office of a domestic or foreign limited partnership.

“Protected series”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1002

.

“Registered limited liability partnership”
means a limited partnership or general partnership formed under the laws of the Commonwealth that is registered under §

50-73.132

.

“State”
means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 1990, c. 343; 1992, c. 575; 1997, c. 190; 2003, c. 340; 2007, c. 631; 2010, c. 675; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Uniform law cross references.

For other signatory state provisions of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 or earlier version), see:

Alaska: Alaska Stat. § 32.11.010 et seq.

Arizona: A.R.S. § 29-301 et seq.

Arkansas: A.C.A. § 4-47-101 et seq.

California: Cal Corp. Code § 15900 et seq.

Colorado: C.R.S. 7-62-101 et seq.

Connecticut: Conn. Gen. Stat. §

34-9

et seq.

Delaware: 6 Del. C. § 17-101 et seq.

Florida: Fla. Stat. § 620.1101 et seq.

Georgia: O.C.G.A. § 14-9-100 et seq.

Hawaii: HRS § 425E-101 et seq.

Illinois: 805 ILCS 215/0.01 et seq.

Indiana: Burns Ind. Code Ann. § 23-16-1-1.

Iowa: Iowa Code § 488.101 et seq.

Kansas: K.S.A. § 56-1a01 et seq.

Kentucky: KRS § 362.2-102 et seq.

Maine: 31 M.R.S. § 1301 et seq.

Maryland: Md. Corporations and Associations Code Ann. § 10-101 et seq.

Massachusetts: ALM GL ch. 109, § 1 et seq.

Michigan: MCLS § 449.1101 et seq.

Minnesota: Minn. Stat. § 321.0101 et seq.

Mississippi: Miss. Code Ann. § 79-14-101 et seq.

Missouri: § 359.011 R.S.Mo. et seq.

Montana: Mont. Code Anno., § 35-12-501 et seq.

Nebraska: R.R.S. Neb. § 67-233 et seq.

Nevada: NRS § 87A.005 et seq.

New Hampshire: RSA 304-B:1 et seq.

New Jersey: N.J. Stat. § 42:2A-1 et seq.

New Mexico: N.M. Stat. Ann. § 54-2A-101 et seq.

New York: NY CLS Partn. § 120.101 et seq.

North Carolina: N.C. Gen. Stat. § 59-101 et seq.

North Dakota: N.D. Cent. Code, § 45-10.2-01 et seq.

Ohio: ORC Ann. § 1776.01 et seq.

Oklahoma: 54 Okl. St. § 500-101A et seq.

Oregon: ORS § 70.005 et seq.

Pennsylvania: 15 Pa. C. S. § 8611 et seq.

Rhode Island: R.I. Gen. Laws § 7-13-1 et seq.

South Carolina: S.C. Code Ann. § 33-42-10 et seq.

South Dakota: S.D. Codified Laws § 48-7-101 et seq.

Tennessee: Tenn. Code Ann. § 61-2-101 et seq.

Texas: Tex. Business Organizations Code § 153.001 et seq.

Utah: Utah Code Ann. §

48-2

e-101 et seq.

Vermont: 11 V.S.A. § 3401 et seq.

Virgin Islands: 26 V.I.C. § 321 et seq.

Washington: Rev. Code Wash. § 25.10.006 et seq.

West Virginia: W. Va. Code § 47-9-1 et seq.

Wisconsin: Wis. Stat. § 179.01 et seq.

Wyoming: Wyo. Stat. § 17-14-201 et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 340, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that amend and reenact §§

8.9A-406

,

8.9A-408

,

13.1-1001.1

,

13.1-1003

,

13.1-1012

,

50-73.2

,

50-73.84

, and

50-73.144

of the Code of Virginia and that amend the Code of Virginia by adding sections numbered 13.1-1010.4 and

13.1-1023.1

shall become effective on July 1, 2003, and that all other provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2003.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 340, effective October 1, 2003, inserted the definitions of “Domestic business trust” and “Foreign business trust”.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631, in the definition of “Foreign registered limited liability partnership,” substituted “meaning” for “meanings” and
deleted “§§ 50-2 and”; and added the definitions for “Principal office” and “Registered limited liability partnership.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 675 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout the section; and in the definition of “principal office,” substituted “limited partnership are located” for “partnership or a registered limited liability partnership are located” at the end of the first sentence and inserted the last sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “requires a different meaning” for “otherwise requires” in the introductory language; and inserted definitions for “Domestic,” “Effective date,” “Entity,” “Foreign,” “Jurisdiction of formation,” “Organic law,” “Other business entity,” and “Protected series.” For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For article discussing partnership tax classification of Uniform Limited Partnership Act real estate shelters, see 11 U. Rich. L. Rev. 743 (1977).

For an article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1067 (1998).

For a symposium on “Withdrawals and Expulsions From Law Firms: The Rights and Duties of Partners and Their Firms,” see 55 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 997 (1998).

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

For annual survey essay, “Partnership Derivative Suits: Jennings, v. Kay Jennings Family Ltd. Partnership,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 167 (2009).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 12-120 Certificate of Limited Partnership, etc.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, §§ 94, 94.2, 95, 96.

§ 50-73.2.
Name.

A limited partnership name, as set forth in its certificate of limited partnership, shall either (i) contain the words “limited partnership” or “a limited partnership” or the abbreviations “L.P.” or “LP” or (ii) in the case of a limited partnership that is also a registered limited liability partnership, comply with the requirements of subdivision A 2 of §

50-73.78

.

A limited partnership name shall not contain:

The name of a limited partner unless (i) it is also the name of a general partner or the corporate name of a corporate general partner, or (ii) the business of the limited partnership had been carried on under that name before the admission of that limited partner;

Any word, abbreviation, or combination of characters that states or implies the limited partnership is a corporation, a limited liability company, a protected series of a limited liability company, or a registered limited liability partnership, unless it is so registered; or

Any word or phrase the use of which is prohibited by law for such limited partnership.

Except as authorized by subsection D, a limited partnership name shall be distinguishable upon the records of the Commission from:

The name of a domestic limited partnership or a foreign limited partnership registered pursuant to this chapter;

A limited partnership name reserved under this chapter;

The designated name adopted by a foreign limited partnership because its real name is unavailable for use in the Commonwealth;

The name of any corporation, whether issuing shares or not issuing shares, existing under the laws of the Commonwealth or authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A corporate name reserved or registered under §

13.1-631

,

13.1-632

,

13.1-830

or

13.1-831

;

The designated name adopted by a foreign corporation, whether issuing shares or not issuing shares, because its real name is unavailable for use in the Commonwealth;

The name of a domestic limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company registered to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A limited liability company name reserved under §

13.1-1013

;

The designated name adopted by a foreign limited liability company because its real name is unavailable for use in the Commonwealth;

The name of a domestic business trust or a foreign business trust registered to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A business trust name reserved under §

13.1-1215

; and

The designated name adopted by a foreign business trust because its real name is unavailable for use in the Commonwealth.

A domestic limited partnership may apply to the Commission for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable upon its records from one or more of the names described in subsection C. The Commission shall authorize use of the name applied for if the other domestic or foreign limited partnership or other business entity consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking in a form satisfactory to the Commission to change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the Commission from the name of the applying limited partnership.

The use of assumed names or fictitious names, as provided for in Chapter 5 (§ 59.1-69 et seq.) of Title 59.1, is not affected by this chapter.

The Commission, in determining whether the name of a limited partnership is distinguishable upon its records from the name of any of the business entities listed in subsection C, shall not consider any word, phrase, abbreviation, or designation required or permitted under this section and §

13.1-544.1

, subsection A of §

13.1-630

, subsection A of §

13.1-1012

, §

13.1-1104

, and subdivision A 2 of §

50-73.78

to be contained in the name of a business entity formed or organized under the laws of the Commonwealth or authorized or registered to transact business in the Commonwealth.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 1998, c. 163; 2003, cc. 340, 592; 2005, c. 379; 2012, c. 63; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Cross references.

As to name of foreign limited partnerships, see §

50-73.56

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 592, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only, (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to the effective date of this act [October 1, 2004] with respect to the name of a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership, and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to the effective date of this act to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

Acts 2012, c. 63, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to the effective date of this act with respect to the name of a corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the propriety of its name prior to the effective date of this act to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 340, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “the abbreviations ‘L.P.’ or ‘LP’ ” for “the abbreviation ‘L.P.’ ” in subdivision 1.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 592, effective October 1, 2004, redesignated former clauses 4 (i) through (iii) as paragraphs 4 a through c; deleted “and” at the end of paragraph 4 b; added paragraphs 4 d through
l
; substituted “Shall” for “May” in subdivision 5; and added the last paragraph.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 379, effective March 21, 2005, in subdivision 5, inserted “designation,” substituted “section and §

13.1-544.1

, subsection A of §

13.1-630

, subsection A of
§

13.1-1012

, §

13.1-1104

, and subdivision A 2 of §

50-73.78

” for “chapter, Chapters 7 (§

13.1-542

et seq.), 9 (§

13.1-601

et seq.), 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.), 13 (§

13.1-1100

et seq.), and 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.) of Title 13.1”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 63 rewrote the section. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “a protected series of a limited liability company, or a registered limited liability partnership, unless it is so registered” in subdivision B 2; and made a stylistic change. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 50-73.3.
Reserved name.

A person may apply to the Commission to reserve the exclusive use of a limited partnership name, including a designated name for a foreign limited partnership. The limited partnership name applied for need not comply with subsection A of §

50-73.2

. If the Commission finds that the limited partnership name is distinguishable upon the records of the Commission, it shall reserve the name for the applicant’s exclusive use for a 120-day period.

The owner of a reserved limited partnership name may renew the reservation for successive 120-day periods each by filing with the Commission, during the 45-day period preceding the date of expiration of the reservation, a renewal application.

The owner of a reserved limited partnership name may transfer the reservation to any other person by delivering to the Commission a notice of the transfer, signed by the applicant for whom the name was reserved and specifying the name and address of the transferee.

A reserved limited partnership name may be used by its owner in connection with (i) the formation or an amendment to change the name of a domestic stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; (ii) an application for a certificate of authority or registration to transact business in the Commonwealth as a foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; or (iii) an amended application for such authority or registration, provided that the proposed name complies with the provisions of §

13.1-630

,

13.1-762

,

13.1-829

,

13.1-924

,

13.1-1012

,

13.1-1054

,

13.1-1214

,

13.1-1244

,

50-73.2

, or

50-73.56

, as the case may be.

History.

1985, c. 607; 2006, c. 505; 2015, c. 444.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 505 substituted “each by filing with the Commission, during the 45-day period preceding the date of expiration of the reservation, a renewal application” for “by filing application therefor” in the third sentence in subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 444 rewrote subsection A; redesignated former second and third paragraphs of subsection B as subsections B and C; substituted “signed” for “executed” in subsection C; and added subsection D.

§ 50-73.4.
Principal office, registered office, and registered agent.

Each domestic limited partnership and each foreign limited partnership registered to transact business in the Commonwealth shall continuously maintain:

A principal office, which shall be a place of its business and which may but need not be within the Commonwealth, at which shall be kept the records required to be maintained pursuant to §

50-73.8

;

A registered office in the Commonwealth that may be the same as any of its places of business; and

A registered agent, who shall be either:

An individual who is a resident of the Commonwealth and is either (i) a general partner of the limited partnership, (ii) an officer or director of a corporate general partner of the limited partnership, (iii) a general partner of a general or limited partnership that is a general partner of the limited partnership, (iv) a member or manager of a limited liability company that is a general partner of the limited partnership, (v) a trustee of a trust that is a general partner of the limited partnership, or (vi) a member of the Virginia State Bar and whose business office is identical with the registered office; or

A domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth, the business office of which is identical with the registered office; provided such a registered agent (i) shall not be its own registered agent and (ii) shall designate by instrument in writing, acknowledged before a notary public, one or more natural persons at the office of the registered agent upon whom any process, notice or demand may be served and shall continuously maintain at least one such person at that office. Whenever any such person accepts service, a photographic copy of such instrument shall be attached to the return.

The sole duty of the registered agent is to forward to the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership at its last known address any process, notice or demand that is served on the registered agent.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 1993, c. 292; 2000, cc. 162, 537; 2001, cc. 517, 541; 2007, c. 631; 2010, c. 675.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 631, cl. 2 provides: “That upon the effective date of this act, the address of a limited partnership’s registered agent on the records of the Commission shall be deemed the address of the limited partnership’s registered office, until the limited partnership changes such addresses on the records in the office of the clerk of the Commission pursuant to the provisions of the Virginia Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (§

50-73.1

et seq.).”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 162, in subdivision A 2 b, deleted “or” following “professional corporation,” inserted “or registered limited liability partnership,” and inserted “with the Virginia State Bar” thereafter, and designated former subsections A1 and B as present subsections B and C, respectively.

The 2000 amendment by c. 537, in subdivision A 2 a, inserted the designations for clauses (i) through (iv) and (vi), inserted clause (v) and deleted “or” at the end; added “or” at the end of subdivision A 2 b and added subdivision A 2 c.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 517 and 541 are identical, and in subdivision A 2 a, inserted “either” preceding “(i),” inserted “of the limited partnership” in clauses (ii) and (iv), and in clause (v), and deleted “registered“ following “partner of the” and “liability” following “limited” and added “or” to the end of clause (vi); in subdivision A 2 b, substituted “A domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company” for “A professional corporation, professional limited liability company” and substituted the language beginning “authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth . . .” for “registered with the Virginia State Bar under §

54.1-3902

; or”; deleted former subdivision A 2 c, which read: “An individual who is a trustee of a trust that is a general partner of the limited partnership”; and in subsection C, inserted “process” and “or demand.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 in subsection A, substituted “to transact business in the Commonwealth” for “pursuant to Article 9 (§

50-73.53

et seq.) of this chapter”; added present subdivision A 2; redesignated former subdivision A 2 as present subdivision A 3; in subdivision A 3 a, added “and whose business office is identical with the registered office” at the end; in subdivision A 3 b, inserted “the business office of which is identical with the registered office”; deleted former subsection B, which read: “The business address of the registered agent shall be within this Commonwealth.”; redesignated former subsection C as present subsection B; inserted “or foreign limited partnership” in subsection C and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 675, in A 1, substituted “principal” for “specified” and “pursuant to” for “by”; and inserted “general or limited partnership that is a” in A 3 a (iii).

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

8095.).

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 499 (2001).

§ 50-73.5.
Change of registered office or registered agent.

A limited partnership or a foreign limited partnership registered to transact business in the Commonwealth may change its registered office or registered agent, or both, upon filing with the Commission a statement of change on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission that sets forth:

The name of the domestic or foreign limited partnership;

The address of its current registered office;

If the current registered office is to be changed, the post office address, including the street and number, if any, of the new registered office, and the name of the city or county in which it is to be located;

The name of its current registered agent;

If the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of the new registered agent; and

That after the change or changes are made, the domestic or foreign limited partnership will be in compliance with the requirements of §

50-73.4

.

A statement of change shall forthwith be filed with the Commission by a domestic or foreign limited partnership whenever its registered agent dies, resigns or ceases to satisfy the requirements of §

50-73.4

.

Except as provided in subsection D, a statement of change shall be executed on behalf of a domestic or foreign limited partnership by a general partner or a liquidating trustee or, if there are no general partners or liquidating trustees, by a limited partner.

A domestic or foreign limited partnership’s registered agent may sign a statement as required above if (i) the business address of the registered agent changes to another post office address within the Commonwealth or (ii) the name of the registered agent has been legally changed. A domestic or foreign limited partnership’s new registered agent may sign and submit for filing a statement as required above if (a) the former registered agent is a business entity that has been merged into the new registered agent, (b) the instrument of merger is on record in the office of the clerk of the Commission, and (c) the new registered agent is an entity that is qualified to serve as a registered agent pursuant to §

50-73.4

. In either instance, the registered agent or surviving entity shall forthwith file a statement as required above, which shall recite that a copy of the statement shall be mailed to the principal office address of the domestic or foreign limited partnership on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 1991, c. 225; 2003, c. 597; 2007, c. 631; 2010, c. 675.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 631, cl. 2 provides: “That upon the effective date of this act, the address of a limited partnership’s registered agent on the records of the Commission shall be deemed the address of the limited partnership’s registered office, until the limited partnership changes such addresses on the records in the office of the clerk of the Commission pursuant to the provisions of the Virginia Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (§

50-73.1

et seq.).”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 597 rewrote subsection C, which formerly read: “If a registered agent changes his business address to another place within this Commonwealth, he shall change his address for any limited partnership of which he is a registered agent by filing a statement as required above except that it need be signed, either manually or in facsimile, only by the registered agent and must recite that a copy of the statement has been mailed to the limited partnership at its specified office.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631, in subsection A, inserted “or a foreign limited partnership registered to transact business in the Commonwealth” and substituted “office or registered agent, or both, upon filing with the Commission a statement of change on a form prescribed and furnished” for “agent or the address of its registered agent, or both, upon filing in the office of the Commission a statement of change on a form supplied”; inserted “domestic or foreign” in subdivision A 1; substituted “office” for “agent” in subdivision A 2; in subidivision A 3, substituted “registered office is to be changed, the post office address, with the street and number, if any, of the new registered office” for “address of its registered agent is to be changed, the post-office address, including the street and number, if any, of the new address of its registered agent”; inserted “or foreign limited partnership” in subdivision A 6; rewrote subsection B, which read: “A new statement shall forthwith be executed by the limited partnership whenever its registered agent dies, resigns or ceases to satisfy the requirements of §

50-73.4

.”; added present subsection C; redesignated former subsection C as subsection D; and in subsection D, inserted “domestic or foreign” in clause (iii); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 675 substituted “including” for “with” in A 3; substituted “domestic” for “limited partnership” in A 6; substituted “domestic or foreign limited partnership” for “limited partnership or foreign limited partnership registered to transact business in the Commonwealth” in subsection B; and rewrote subsection D.

§ 50-73.6.
Resignation of registered agent.

A registered agent may resign as agent for the domestic or foreign limited partnership by signing and filing with the Commission a statement of resignation stating (i) the name of the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership, (ii) the name of the agent, and (iii) that the agent resigns from serving as registered agent for the domestic or foreign limited partnership. The statement of resignation shall be accompanied by a certification that the registered agent will have a copy of the statement mailed to the principal office of the domestic or foreign limited partnership by certified mail on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed. When the statement of resignation takes effect, the registered office is also discontinued.

A statement of resignation takes effect on the earlier of (i) 12:01 a.m. on the thirty-first day after the date on which the statement was filed with the Commission or (ii) the date on which a statement of change to appoint a registered agent is filed, in accordance with §

50-73.5

, with the Commission.

History.

1985, c. 607; 2010, c. 434; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 434, in subsection A, substituted “resign the agency” for “resign his agency,” “by a certification that the registered agent shall mail” for “his certification that he has mailed,” and “thereof to the” for “thereof by certified mail to the” and “principal office of the domestic or foreign” for “business address of any general partner set forth in the limited partnership’s certificate of,” inserted “by certified mail on or before the business day following the day on which the statement is filed,” and added the last sentence; and in subsection B, inserted “and the registered office discontinued if so provided.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 50-73.7.
Service on limited partnership.

A domestic or foreign limited partnership’s registered agent is the limited partnership’s agent for service of process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the limited partnership. The registered agent, by instrument in writing, acknowledged before a notary public, may designate a natural person or persons in the office of the registered agent upon whom any such process, notice or demand may be served. Whenever any such person accepts service of process, a photographic copy of such instrument shall be attached to the return.

Whenever a domestic or foreign limited partnership fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in the Commonwealth, or whenever its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, then the clerk of the Commission shall be an agent of the limited partnership upon whom service may be made in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of serving a domestic or foreign limited partnership.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1991, c. 672; 2001, cc. 517, 541; 2007, c. 631.

Cross references.

As to service of process on foreign corporations and partnerships, see §

28.2-401

.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 517 and 541, are identical, and inserted “natural” following “may designate a” in subsection A and deleted former subsection D, which read: “[Repealed.]”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 inserted “domestic or foreign” in subsections A, B and C; and in subsection B, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” and “the registered office” for “his address” near the middle.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Service on general partner. —

Where an estate administrator for a deceased patient filed a wrongful death action against a health center and others, which center was owned and operated by two limited partnerships, each of which had a general partner as a member, the administrator’s service pursuant to §

8.01-304

and §

50-73.7

of the Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act on the general partner within the two-year limitations period of §

8.01-244

was proper and withstood challenge, as service on the limited partnerships was not required by the Revised Uniform Partnership Act, §

50-73.79

, but rather, it was only suggested as one possible method pusuant to §

50-73.97

.Lucas v. Med. Facilities of Am., Inc., 74 Va. Cir. 206, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 180 (Roanoke County Sept. 28, 2007).

§ 50-73.8.
Records to be kept.

Each limited partnership shall keep at its principal office the following:

A current list of the full name and last known business address of each partner, separately identifying the general partners in alphabetical order and the limited partners in alphabetical order;

A copy of the certificate of limited partnership and all certificates of amendment thereto, together with executed copies of any powers of attorney pursuant to which any certificate has been executed;

Copies of the limited partnership’s federal, state and local income tax returns and reports, if any, for the three most recent years;

Copies of any then-effective written partnership agreements and of any financial statements of the limited partnership for the three most recent years; and

Unless contained in a written partnership agreement, a writing setting out:

The amount of cash and a description and statement of the agreed value of the other property or services contributed by each partner and which each partner has agreed to contribute;

The times at which or events on the happening of which any additional contributions agreed to be made by each partner are to be made;

Any right of a partner to receive, or of a general partner to make, distributions to a partner which include a return of all or any part of the partner’s contribution; and

Any events upon the happening of which the limited partnership is to be dissolved and its affairs wound up.

Records kept under this section are subject to inspection and copying at the reasonable request, and at the expense, of any partner during ordinary business hours.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 2010, c. 675.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 675 substituted “its principal office the following” for “the specified office required to be maintained by §

50-73.4

the following” in the introductory language of subsection A.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, § 94.1.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Construction. —

Reading the statutes together, the information sought pursuant to subdivision 1 of §

50-73.26

) must be at the reasonable request of a limited partner and the statutes requires a plaintiff to state some reasonable purpose for the demand; the General Assembly’s intent to restrict a limited partner’s right to demand information is further shown in subdivision 2 of §

50-73.26

, which only allows limited partners to seek further information that is not otherwise outlined in §

50-73.8

from time to time. Gordon v. Arrowhead Apts. Ltd. P'ship, 104 Va. Cir. 355, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 62 (Fairfax County Mar. 23, 2020).